dev/apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
<pardef n="/cAhiye__tam">
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>cAhiye</l><r>nA_cAhiye<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/cAhiye_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_cAhiye_WA</l><r>nA_cAhiye_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>nA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>nA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>nA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>nA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>nA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>nA_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>nA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>nA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hEM</l><r>nA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>nA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>nA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>hE</l><r>nA_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/hI_hE__tam">
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nA_hI_hE</l><r>nA_hI_hE<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/cAhiye_honA_kA_nA__tam">
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA</l><r>nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/padA__tam">
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padA</l><r>nahIM_padA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/padawA_WA__tam">
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>nahIM_padawA_WA</l><r>nahIM_padawA_WA<s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nA_padA"><i></i><par n="/padA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_hI_hE"><i></i><par n="/hI_hE__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nahIM_cAhiye_honA_kA_nA"><i></i><par n="/cAhiye_honA_kA_nA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nahIM_padA"><i></i><par n="/padA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nahIM_padawA_WA"><i></i><par n="/padawA_WA__tam"/></e>
<e lm="nA_padawA_WA"><i></i><par n="/padawA_WA__tam"/></e>
